Utah statutes.
76-10-509.4.   Prohibition of possession of certain weapons by minors.

(1)  A minor under 18 years of age may not possess a handgun.

(2)  Except as provided by federal law, a minor under 18 years of age may not possess the following:

(a)  a short barreled rifle or short barreled shotgun; or

(b)  a fully automatic weapon.

(3)  Any person who violates Subsection (1) is guilty of:

(a)  a class B misdemeanor upon the first offense; and

(b)  a class A misdemeanor for each subsequent offense.

(4)  Any person who violates Subsection (2) is guilty of a third degree felony.



Amended by Chapter 301, 2013 General Session

